Rhode Island statutes. Title 38 Public Records
Chapter 1 Custody and Protection

38-1-1.
Delivery of records on leaving public office.

Every person who shall hold a public office shall, upon leaving the office, deliver to his or her successor in office, or, if there is no successor, to the public records administration program of the office of secretary of state, all records, books, writings, letters, and documents, kept or received by him or her in the transaction of his or her official business, and to the director of the department of administration all money in his or her hands which he or she shall have received as trust funds from any person or otherwise in the course of his or her official business; and every person who shall, without just cause, refuse or neglect for the space of ten (10) days after request made in writing by any citizen of the state, to deliver as herein required those records, books, writings, letters, or documents, or to pay over those moneys, to the person authorized to receive the requested items, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) and be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 31, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 41, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 42, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 494, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

38-1-1

; P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 167; P.L. 2000, ch. 233, § 1.

38-1-1.1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Agency” or “public body” shall mean any executive, legislative, judicial, regulatory, administrative body of the state, or any political subdivision thereof; including, but not limited to, any department, division, agency, commission, board, office, bureau, authority, any school, fire, or water district, or other agency or quasi-public agency of Rhode Island state or local government which exercises governmental functions, or any other public or private agency, person, partnership, corporation, or business entity acting on behalf of any public agency.

“Public business” means any matter over which the public body has supervision, control, jurisdiction, or advisory power.

“Public record” or “public records” shall mean all documents, papers, letters, maps, books, tapes, photographs, films, sound recordings, or other material regardless of physical form or characteristics made or received pursuant to law or ordinance or in connection with the transaction of official business by any agency.

“Supervisor of the regulatory body” means the chief or head of a section having enforcement responsibility for a particular statute or set of rules and regulations within a regulatory agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 40; P.L. 2012, ch. 451, § 1.

38-1-2.
Delivery of records to lawful custodian.

Every person, other than the lawful custodian thereof, who shall have in his or her possession, or under his or her control, any such record, book, writing, letter, or document as is designated in §

38-1-1

and who shall, without just cause, refuse or neglect for the space of ten (10) days after request made in writing by any citizen of the state, to deliver that record, book, writing, letter, or document to the lawful custodian of the records shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) and be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 31, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 41, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 42, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 494, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

38-1-2

.

38-1-3.
Receptacles for city and town records.

It shall be the duty of every city and town to provide fireproof receptacles for records and documents relating to the official business of the city or town where the records and documents may be kept free from injury from any cause. The receptacles shall be of suitable type and subject to approval by the public records administrator. In case of failure of any city or town to provide fireproof receptacles, in accordance with the provisions of this section, it shall be the duty of the public records administrator to furnish receptacles as may be suitable for that purpose, and he or she shall have a claim against the town for that expense, which claim shall be enforced in accordance with §

45-15-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 41, § 3; P.L. 1911, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 42, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 839, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 494, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

38-1-3

; P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 2.

38-1-4.
Keeping of records in vaults provided — Penalty.

When not in use, the records and documents shall be kept in the fireproof rooms, vaults, or safes provided for them. Whoever unlawfully keeps in his or her possession any public record, or unlawfully removes the record from the room in which it is usually kept, or alters, defaces, mutilates, or destroys any public record, or violates any provision of this section, shall, for each offense, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 41, § 4; P.L. 1911, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 42, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 494, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

38-1-4

.

38-1-5 — 38-1-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 645, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1912, ch. 822, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1397, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1732, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1922, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2219, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, §§ 5, 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 42, § 5; P.L. 1925, ch. 622, § 2; P.L. 1927, ch. 985, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 494, §§ 5—8; G.L. 1956, §§

38-1-5

— 38-1-8; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 3.

38-1-9.
Custodian designated.

The elected or appointed state, county, or municipal officer or officers charged by law with the responsibility of maintaining the office having public records shall be the custodian thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 4.

38-1-10.
Disposal of records.

No public official may mutilate, destroy, sell, loan, or otherwise dispose of any public record without the consent of the public records administration program of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 4; P.L. 2000, ch. 233, § 1.

38-1-11.
Assistance of the public records administration program.

The public records administration program of the secretary of state shall have the right to examine the condition of public records and shall give advice and assistance to public officials in the solution of their problems of preserving, creating, filing, and making available the public records in their custody. When requested by the program, public officials shall assist the program in the preparation of records control schedules of public records in their custody approved by the head of the agency having custody of the records. Upon review and approval of the schedules by the program, the program shall, subject to the availability of necessary space, staff, and other facilities for those purposes, make available space in its record center for the filing of semi-current records so scheduled and in its public records repository for noncurrent records of permanent value and shall render other assistance as needed, including the microfilming of records so scheduled.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 353, § 4; P.L. 2000, ch. 233, § 1.